Nebraska, session 109, LB892.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB892 LB892
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 38-1716, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
38-1716 No person shall operate or profess or attempt to operate a
massage therapy establishment unless such establishment is licensed by
the department under the Massage Therapy Practice Act. The department
shall not issue or renew a license for a massage therapy establishment
until all requirements of the act have been complied with. No person
shall engage in any of the practices of massage therapy in any location
or premises other than a licensed massage therapy establishment except as
specifically permitted by the board in the act.
Sec. 2. Original section 38-1716, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-2-